Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 23 Drug-free Public Work Force

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 enactment of this chapter, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 383 (1990).

45-23-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Drug-free Public Work Force Act of 1990.”

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1.

45-23-2.
Legislative finding and declaration.

The General Assembly finds that the manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of controlled substances, marijuana, and other dangerous drugs in an unlawful manner is a serious threat to the public health, safety, and welfare. It is declared to be a primary purpose and goal of this state, of all of its agencies and instrumentalities, and of all of its public officials and employees to take all reasonable steps possible to eradicate the unlawful manufacture, distribution, sale, and possession of controlled substances, marijuana, and other dangerous drugs. With this purpose in mind, the General Assembly declares that its work force must be absolutely free of any person who would knowingly manufacture, distribute, sell, or possess a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug in an unlawful manner.
For this reason, the General Assembly enacts this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1.

45-23-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Controlled substance” means any drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in the definition of the term “controlled substance” in paragraph (4) of Code Section 16-13-21.

“Convicted” or “conviction” refers to a final conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction or the acceptance of a plea of guilty.

“Dangerous drug” means any drug or substance defined as such under Code Section 16-13-71.

“Marijuana” means any substance described in paragraph (16) of Code Section 16-13-21.

“Public employee” means any person employed on a full-time, part-time, temporary, or intermittent basis by the state, including any agency, authority, department, bureau, or instrumentality thereof, or by any entity covered under the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of this title. Such term shall also include all employees, officials, or administrators of any public school system, including, but not limited to, primary, secondary, and postsecondary institutions operated by local or independent boards of education that receive any funds from the State of Georgia or any agency thereof.

“Public employer” means any state agency, department, board, bureau, or other instrumentality. This term also includes any agency covered under the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of this title or any public school system, including, but not limited to, primary, secondary, and postsecondary institutions operated by local or independent boards of education that receive any funds from the State of Georgia or any agency thereof.

“Public employment” means employment by any public employer.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-83/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1, purported to amend this Code section, but the amendment was inapplicable.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-23-4.
Suspension or termination of public employee convicted of drug offense.

Any public employee who is convicted for the first time, under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state, of any criminal offense involving the manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug shall be suspended from his or her public employment for a period of not less than two months. Any such employee shall be required as a condition of completion of suspension to complete a drug abuse treatment and education program licensed under Chapter 5 of Title 26 and approved by: (1) the State Personnel Board in the case of employees employed by departments or agencies subject to the board’s rules and regulations, as such terms are defined in Code Section 45-20-2; or (2) the public employer having management and control of the employee in the case of other public employees.

Any public employee who is convicted for a second or subsequent time, under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state, of any criminal offense involving the manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug shall be terminated from his or her public employment and shall be ineligible for other public employment for a period of five years from the most recent date of conviction.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-84/HB 642.

Cross references.

Controlled substances, T. 16, C. 13.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-23-5.
Ineligibility for public employment of person convicted of drug offense.

Any person who has been convicted for the first time, under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state, of any criminal offense involving the manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug shall be ineligible for any public employment for a period of three months from the date of conviction.

Any person who has been convicted two or more times, under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state, of any criminal offense involving the manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug shall be ineligible for any public employment for a period of five years from the most recent date of conviction.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1.

Cross references.

Controlled substances, T. 16, C. 13.

45-23-6.
Additional or more stringent sanctions authorized.

The suspension, expulsion, and ineligibility sanctions prescribed in this chapter are intended as minimum sanctions, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any public employer from establishing and implementing additional or more stringent sanctions for criminal offenses and other conduct involving the unlawful manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1.

45-23-7.
Continuance of employment for drug user; requirements and procedure.

On and after July 1, 1990, if, prior to an arrest for an offense involving a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug, a public employee notifies the employee’s public employer that the employee illegally uses a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug and is receiving or agrees to receive treatment under a drug abuse treatment and education program licensed under Chapter 5 of Title 26 and approved by: (1) the State Personnel Board in the case of employees employed by departments or agencies subject to the board’s rules and regulations, as such terms are defined in Code Section 45-20-2; or (2) the public employer having management and control of the employee in the case of other public employees, the public employee shall be entitled to maintain the employee’s public employment for up to one year as long as the employee follows the treatment plan. During this period, the public employee shall not be separated from public employment solely on the basis of the employee’s drug dependence, but the employee’s work activities may be restructured if practicable to protect persons or property. No statement made by an employee to a supervisor of the public employee or other person in order to comply with this Code section shall be admissible in any civil, administrative, or criminal proceeding as evidence against the public employee. The rights granted by this Code section shall be available to a public employee only once during a five-year period and shall not apply to any public employee who has refused to be tested or who has tested positive for a controlled substance, marijuana, or a dangerous drug.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-85/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-23-8.
Administrative procedures.

Administrative procedures for the implementation of this chapter shall be promulgated by the State Personnel Board for departments or agencies subject to the board’s rules and regulations, as such terms are defined in Code Section 45-20-2, and by other public employers for other public employees under their management and control. Such procedures shall include those elements of due process of law required by the Constitution of Georgia and the United States Constitution.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-86/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-23-9.
Application of chapter.

This chapter shall apply only with respect to criminal offenses committed on or after July 1, 1990; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall prevent any public employer from implementing sanctions additional to or other than those provided for in this chapter with respect to offenses committed prior to July 1, 1990.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-23-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2004, § 1.